Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-2905
Disclosure of personal information
prohibited.

(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of state
law to the contrary, except as provided in sections 60-2906 and 60-2907, the
department and any officer, employee, agent, or contractor of the department
shall not disclose personal information about any person obtained by the department
in connection with a motor vehicle record.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary,
except as provided in sections 60-483, 60-484, 60-4,144, and 60-2909.01, the department and
any officer, employee, agent, or contractor of the department shall not disclose
sensitive personal information about any person obtained by the department
in connection with a motor vehicle record without the express written consent
of the person to whom such information pertains.

Laws 1997, LB 635, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 1317, § 12;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 57.